Tennessee, session 114, SB1836.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The Department of Transportation shall conduct a study regarding the
development and viability of a new, third bridge crossing the Mississippi River and connecting to
Arkansas, together with related highway facilities and structures needed to complete the bridge
project. On or before February 1, 2027, the Department shall report its findings, including any
legislative recommendations, from the study to the transportation and safety committee of the
senate and the committee in the house of representatives having jurisdiction over transportation
infrastructure issues. The report shall identify funds available through federal, state, or local
sources to initiate the development of this bridge and the timing for initiating such development.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1836
011462
- 1 -